en: Adhesive type: Permanent; Removable; Other
fi: Liimatyyppi: Pysyvä; Irrotettava; Muu
hu: Ragasztó típusa: Tartós; Eltávolítható; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tip adeziv: Permanent; Reutilizabil; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta lepila: Trajno; Odstranljivo; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ lepidla: Trvalý; Odnímateľný; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de adesivo: Permanente; Removível; Outro
zh-TW: 黏著劑類型: 永久型; 可拆式; 其他
ru: Тип фиксации на клеящий материал: Постоянный; Съемный; Другое
th: ประเภทกาว: ถาวร; ถอดออกได้; อื่นๆ
de: Klebstofftyp: Permanent; Abtrennbar; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 粘合剂类型: 永久性; 可移动; 其他
es: Tipo de adhesivo: Permanente; Despegables; Otros
nb: Type klebemiddel: Permanent; Avtakbar; Annet
bg-BG: Тип лепило: Постоянно; Подвижно; Други
ko: 접착 유형: 영구; 제거 가능; 기타
sv: Typ av lim: Permanent; Avtagbar; Övrigt
ja: 粘着タイプ: 取り外し不可; 取り外し可能; その他
vi: Loại chất kết dính: Vĩnh viễn; Tháo rời được; Khác
tr: Yapışkan Tipi: Kalıcı; Çıkarılabilir; Diğer
nl: Lijmtype: Permanent; Uitneembaar; Andere
it: Tipo di adesivo: Permanenti; Rimovibili; Altro
da: Klæbende type: Permanent; Aftagelig; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de adesivo: Permanente; Removível; Outro
cs: Typ přilnavosti: Permanentní; Odnímatelný; Jiné
el: Τύπος κόλλας: Μόνιμο; Αφαιρούμενο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Klijų tipas: Nuolatinė; Nuimama; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta ljepila: Trajno; Uklonjivo; Ostalo
fr: Type d’adhésif: Permanent; Repositionnable; Autre
pl: Typ kleju: Stała; Wymienne; Inne